District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.154

Statehood initiatives budgeting.

Beginning in Fiscal Year 2015, the Chief Financial Officer shall assign an individual agency-level code for Statehood Initiatives in the District’s financial system. The agency-level code shall be used to track the operating budget for the District’s efforts to achieve statehood and any funds that are appropriated for that purpose.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 1112, 61 DCR 9990
For temporary (90 days) addition of section, see § 1112 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of section, see § 1112 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of section, see § 1112 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).